Florida, session 2026, SB576.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 25 26 Section 1.âSection 282.31855, Florida Statutes, is created 27 to read: 28 282.31855âLocal Government Cybersecurity Protection 29 Program.â 30 (1)âThe Local Government Cybersecurity Protection Program 31 is created within the Florida Digital Service, to be 32 administered by the Florida Digital Service. The purpose of the 33 grant program is to assist eligible local governments in 34 mitigating and defending against cybersecurity threats, 35 including, but not limited to, ransomware incidents. 36 (2)âUnder the grant program, the Florida Digital Service 37 shall enter into data-sharing agreements with local governments 38 as necessary to facilitate the collection, analysis, and 39 exchange of security-related information to support the 40 detection, prevention, and response to cybersecurity incidents 41 consistent with s. 282.318. 42 (3)(a)âThe Florida Digital Service shall administer the 43 grant program based on objective eligibility and evaluation 44 criteria to provide information technology commodities and 45 services directly to local governments for the purpose of 46 developing and enhancing cybersecurity risk management programs 47 consistent with s. 282.3185. 48 (b)âThe Florida Digital Service shall contract for 49 information technology commodities and services and shall award 50 such commodities and services to local governments eligible 51 under the grant program criteria. 52 (c)âIn awarding information technology commodities and 53 services, the Florida Digital Service shall give preference to 54 fiscally constrained counties as described in s. 218.67(1). 55 (d)âGrants shall be awarded to eligible local governments 56 by October 1 of each year. 57 (4)âThe Florida Digital Service may apply for and accept 58 any funds or grants made available to it by any agency or 59 department of the Federal Government to further the grant 60 program. 61 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.